District of Columbia statutes.
16-1361

Verdict.

At the close of the evidence in a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter, the court shall charge the jury and furnish them with a written form to be used in returning their verdict. The members of the jury may separate when not engaged in the consideration of their verdict. When the jury, or a majority thereof, have agreed upon their verdict they shall, through their foreman, so notify the court, which shall thereupon pass an order setting a day for the return of the verdict in open court. The verdict shall be in writing subscribed by the jurors concurring therein, and shall set forth, parcel by parcel, the compensation to be paid for the taking of the lands to be condemned.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 579, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1362 and § 16-1363.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1361.
1973 Ed., § 16-1361.